Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-912
Completion of organization; meeting; notice.

After completion of the hearing required by section 12-911, the county board, if it determines that formation of the proposed district would promote public health, convenience, or welfare, shall order such changes in the boundaries of such proposed district or of the areas into which such proposed district is to be divided as it shall deem proper. The county board shall thereupon designate a time and place for all taxpayers to meet at a place within such district to complete the organization thereof. Notice of such meeting shall be published once each week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the district.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 4, p. 139.